Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 4. Penalties and Enforcement.

Sec. 24.45.120.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.121.
Prohibitions.

A lobbyist may not

engage in any activity as a lobbyist before registering under AS

24.45.041

;

do anything with the intent of placing a public official under personal obligation to the lobbyist or to the lobbyist’s employer;

intentionally deceive or attempt to deceive any public official with regard to any material fact pertinent to pending or proposed legislative or administrative action;

cause or influence the introduction of a legislative measure solely for the purpose of thereafter being employed to secure its passage or its defeat;

cause a communication to be sent to a public official in the name of any fictitious person or in the name of any real person, except with the consent of that person;

accept or agree to accept any payment in any way contingent upon the defeat, enactment, or outcome of any proposed legislative or administrative action;

serve as a member of a state board or commission, if the lobbyist’s employer may receive direct economic benefit from a decision of that board or commission;

serve as a campaign manager or director, serve as a campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer on a finance or fund-raising committee, host a fund-raising event, directly or indirectly collect contributions for, or deliver contributions to, a candidate, or otherwise engage in the fund-raising activity of a legislative campaign or campaign for governor or lieutenant governor if the lobbyist has registered, or is required to register, as a lobbyist under this chapter, during the calendar year; this paragraph does not apply to a representational lobbyist as defined in the regulations of the Alaska Public Offices Commission, and does not prohibit a lobbyist from making personal contributions to a candidate as authorized by AS 15.13 or personally advocating on behalf of a candidate;

offer, solicit, initiate, facilitate, or provide to or on behalf of a person covered by AS 24.60 a gift, other than food or a nonalcoholic beverage for immediate consumption under AS

24.60.080(a)(2)(A)

, or a compassionate gift under AS

24.60.075

; however, this paragraph does not prohibit a lobbyist from providing

a gift to a legislator or legislative employee who is a member of the lobbyist’s immediate family as defined in AS

24.60.990(a)

, if the gift is unconnected to the recipient’s legislative status;

tickets to a charity event described in AS

24.60.080(a)(2)(B)

; or

a contribution to a charity event under AS

24.60.080(c)(10)

;

make or offer a gift or a campaign contribution whose acceptance by the person to whom it is offered would violate AS 24.60 or AS 39.52.

A person may not employ for pay or any consideration, or pay or agree to pay consideration to, a person to lobby who is not registered under AS

24.45.041

unless that person registers and that person does in fact so register before engaging in lobbying.

A former member of the legislature may not engage in activity as a lobbyist before the legislature for a period of one year after the former member has left the legislature. This subsection does not prohibit a former member from acting as a volunteer lobbyist described in AS

24.45.161(a)(1)

or a representational lobbyist as defined under regulations of the commission.

An individual may not, at any time that AS 39.52 prohibits that individual from engaging in activity as a lobbyist, register as a lobbyist under this chapter or engage in any activity as a lobbyist. This subsection does not prohibit registration or service as a volunteer lobbyist described in AS

24.45.161(a)(1)

or a representational lobbyist, as defined in regulation by the commission.

The spouse or domestic partner of a legislator may not engage in activity as a lobbyist. This subsection does not prohibit the spouse or domestic partner from acting as a volunteer lobbyist under AS

24.45.161(a)(1)

or a representational lobbyist, as defined in regulation by the commission.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 159 SLA 1984; am §§ 37, 38 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 26 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2006; am §§ 15, 16 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 2008; am § 6 ch 61 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the applicability of AS 15.13 to certain persons if a court determines that persons who are not individuals must be allowed to contribute to candidates or groups, see § 30, ch. 48, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For limitations on lobbying by public entities, see AS

44.99.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, in (a)(9), substituted “food or a nonalcoholic beverage for immediate consumption under AS

24.60.080(a)(2)(A)

,” for “food or beverage for immediate consumption” following “a gift, other than”. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 33(a), ch. 48, SLA 1996 provides that the amendment to this section made by § 26, ch. 48, SLA 1996 takes effect only if the lieutenant governor determines that §§ 1 — 32, ch. 48, SLA 1996 are substantially the same as the law proposed by the initiative identified as Initiative Petition 95 CFPO. The lieutenant governor communicated her determination to that effect to the initiative sponsors by letter dated May 29, 1996. See also May 21, 1996 Op. Att’y Gen. Accordingly, under § 35, ch. 48, SLA 1996, this amendment to this section takes effect January 1, 1997.

For provision relating to the severability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 15, ch. 61, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 24.45.130.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.131.
Examination of statements, reports.

The commission or its staff shall examine each statement or report filed under this chapter within 10 days after the date it is filed. A person required to file a statement or report under this chapter shall be notified immediately if

it appears that the person has failed to file a statement or report as required by law or that the statement or report filed does not conform to the requirements of this chapter; or

a written complaint is filed with the commission by any person alleging that a statement or report filed with the commission does not conform to the requirements of this chapter, or to the truth, or that a person subject to the provisions of this chapter has failed to file a statement or report in the manner prescribed by this chapter.

The commission shall conduct an investigation, and may thereafter conduct a hearing, into an allegation under (a)(2) of this section.

The commission shall report any suspected violations of this chapter to the attorney general, to a district attorney in the judicial district where the alleged violation occurred, or to a grand jury.

If a member of the commission files a complaint, that member of the commission may not participate in any proceeding of the commission relating to the complaint.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am §§ 5, 6 ch 95 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska public offices commission complaints and investigations, see 2 AAC 50, art. 3.

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.135.
Administrative complaints.

A person may file a written complaint alleging that a violation of AS

24.45.121

—

24.45.171

has occurred or is occurring.

Complaints filed under (a) of this section must be filed within five years after the date of the alleged violation.

History.

(§ 7 ch 95 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13(d), ch. 95, SLA 2008 provides that the section “applies to complaints alleging violations of AS

24.45.121

—

24.45.171

that occur on or after January 1, 2009.”

Sec. 24.45.140.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.141.
Civil penalty: Late registration, filing of required statements or reports.

A person who fails to register or to file a properly completed and certified report or statement, as applicable, within the time required by this chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10 a day for each day the delinquency continues as determined by the commission subject to right of appeal to the superior court.
An affidavit stating facts in mitigation may be submitted to the commission by a person against whom a civil penalty is assessed. However, the imposition of the penalties prescribed in this section or in AS

24.45.151

does not excuse the lobbyist or employer of a lobbyist from filing statements or reports required by this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.150.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.151.
Criminal penalties.

An individual who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, whether acting for oneself, on behalf of an employer, or in concert with other persons, is, upon conviction, punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

An individual who knowingly causes, participates in, aids, abets, ratifies, or confirms any violation of a provision of this chapter is, upon conviction, punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

A person, other than an individual, who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, whether acting for oneself, on behalf of an employer, or in concert with other persons, or who knowingly causes, participates in, aids, abets, ratifies, or confirms any violation of a provision of this chapter is, upon conviction, punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000 for each offense.

A person who knowingly makes a false or misleading report or statement required under this chapter is, upon conviction, punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)